Washington statutes.
RCW 18.84.123

Application, certification, and renewal fees.

In accordance with RCW 43.135.055, the department may establish application, certification, and renewal fees as necessary to recover the cost of implementing chapter 246, Laws of 2008.

[ 2008 c 285 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Captions not law—Effective date—2008 c 285: See notes following RCW 43.22.434.